Utah statutes.
64-13-29.   Violation of parole or probation -- Detention -- Hearing.
(1)  The department shall ensure that the court is notified of violations of
the terms and conditions of probation in the case of probationers under the
department's supervision, or the Board of Pardons and Parole in the case of
parolees under the department's supervision. In cases where the department
desires to detain an offender alleged to have violated his parole or probation
and where it is unlikely that the Board of Pardons and Parole or court will
conduct a hearing within a reasonable time to determine if the offender has
violated his conditions of parole or probation, the department shall hold an
administrative hearing within a reasonable time, unless the hearing is waived
by the parolee or probationer, to determine if there is probable cause to
believe that a violation has occurred.  If there is a conviction for a crime
based on the same charges as the probation or parole violation, or a finding
by a federal or state court that there is probable cause to believe that an
offender has committed a crime based on the same charges as the probation or
parole violation, the department need not hold its administrative hearing.
(2)  The appropriate officer or officers of the department shall, as soon as
practical following the department's administrative hearing, report to the
court or the Board of Pardons and Parole, furnishing a summary of the hearing,
and may make recommendations regarding the disposition to be made of the
parolee or probationer.  Pending any proceeding under this section, the
department may take custody of and detain the parolee or probationer involved
for a period not to exceed 72 hours excluding weekends and holidays.
(3)  If the hearing officer determines that there is probable cause to believe
that the offender has violated the conditions of his parole or probation, the
department may detain the offender for a reasonable period of time after the
hearing or waiver, as necessary to arrange for the incarceration of the
offender.  Written order of the department is sufficient authorization for any
peace officer to incarcerate the offender.  The department may promulgate
rules for the implementation of this section.
